de: Transparenz/Tönung des Lacks: Bernstein; Braun; Transparent; Golden/Gelb; Rötlich-braun; Sonstiges
cs: Průhlednost/tónování laku: Jantarová; Hnědá; Průhledné; Zlatá/žlutá; Červenohnědá; Jiné
it: Trasparenza/tinta della vernice: Ambra; Marrone; Trasparente; Dorato/Giallo; Marrone rossiccio; Altro
ru: Прозрачность или оттенок лака: Янтарный; Коричневый; Прозрачный; Золотистый/желтый; Красновато-коричневый; Другое
fr: Transparence ou teinte du vernis: Ambré; Marron; Transparent; Doré/jaune; Brun rougeâtre; Autre
lt-LT: Lako skaidrumas / atspalvis: Gintaro; Ruda; Skaidri; Auksinė / geltona; Rausvai ruda; Kita
nb: Lakktransparens/fargetone: Ravfarget; Brun; Gjennomsiktig; Gylden/gul; Rødbrun; Annet
vi: Độ trong suốt/màu sắc của vecni: Màu hổ phách; Màu nâu; Trong suốt; Vàng kim/Vàng; Nâu đỏ; Khác
hr-HR: Prozirnost/nijansa laka: Jantarna; Smeđa; Prozirna; Zlatna/žuta; Crvenkastosmeđa; Ostalo
da: Gennemsigtighed eller farvetone for lak: Ravfarvet; Brun; Gennemsigtig; Gylden/gul; Rødbrun; Andet
ro-RO: Transparența/nuanța lacului: Chihlimbar; Maro; Transparent; Auriu/galben; Maro roșcat; Altele
pt-BR: Verniz transparência/tonalidade: Âmbar; Marrom; Transparente; Dourado/Amarelo; Marrom-avermelhado; Outro
el: Διαφάνεια/χρώμα βερνικιού: Κεχριμπάρι; Brown; Clear; Χρυσαφί/Κίτρινο; Κοκκινοκαφέ; Άλλο
pl: Przezierność/odcień lakieru: Bursztynowy; Brązowy; Przezroczysty; Złoty/żółty; Czerwonawo-brązowy; Inne
zh-TW: 清漆透明度/色調: 琥珀色; 棕色; 透明; 金色/黃色; 紅棕色; 其他
th: ความโปร่งใส/สีของน้ำยาเคลือบเงา: สีอำพัน; สีน้ำตาล; โปร่งใส; สีทอง/สีเหลือง; สีน้ำตาลแดง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Прозрачност/оттенък на лака: Кехлибар; Кафяв; Безцветен; Златист/жълт; Червеникавокафяв; Друго
ko: 바니쉬 투명도/색조: 앰버; 갈색; 투명색; 골든/옐로; 적갈색; 기타
pt-PT: Transparência/tonalidade do verniz: Âmbar; Castanho; Transparente; Dourado/amarelo; Castanho avermelhado; Outro
sv: Lacktransparens/toning: Bärnsten; Brun; Genomskinlig; Gyllene/gul; Rödbrun; Övrigt
hu: Lakk átlátszósága/színezése: Borostyán; Barna; Átlátszó; Arany / Sárga; Vörösesbarna; Egyéb
zh-CN: 清漆透明度/色调: 琥珀色; 棕色; 透明; 金色/黄色; 红棕色; 其他
fi: Lakan läpinäkyvyys/sävy: Meripihka; Ruskea; Läpinäkyvä; Kullankeltainen / keltainen; Punaruskea; Muu
sl-SI: Prosojnost/pobarvanost laka: Jantarna; Rjava; Prozorna; Zlata/rumena; Rdečkasto rjava; Drugo
sk-SK: Priehľadnosť/odtieň laku: Jantárový; Hnedý; Číry; Zlatý/žltý; Červenohnedý; Iné
es: Transparencia/tono del barniz: Ámbar; Marrón; Transparente; Dorado/amarillo; Marrón rojizo; Otro
tr: Vernik şeffaflık/renk tonu: Kehribar rengi; Kahverengi; Şeffaf; Altın/sarı; Kızılımsı kahverengi; Diğer
ja: ニス透明度／色合い: アンバー; 茶色; 透明; ゴールデン/イエロー; 赤茶色; その他
en: Varnish transparency/tint: Amber; Brown; Clear; Golden/Yellow; Reddish-brown; Other
nl: Lak transparantie/tint: Amber; Bruin; Transparant; Goud/geel; Roodbruin; Overig